Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
PART 5 Appeals and Final Judgment

22-2-80.
Appeal to jury in superior court generally.

In case either party is dissatisfied with the amount of the assessors’ award, he or they may, within ten days from the time the award is filed, enter in writing an appeal from the award to the superior court of the county where the award is filed. At the term succeeding the filing of the appeal, it shall be the duty of the judge to cause an issue to be made and tried by a jury as to the value of the property or interest taken or the amount of damage done, with the same right to move for a new trial and file an appeal as in other cases at law.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 22; Civil Code 1895, § 4678; Civil Code 1910, § 5228; Code 1933, § 36-601.

22-2-81.
Effect of appeal on condemnor’s right to use condemned property or interest; payment, tender, or deposit of award as condition on condemnor’s right to use property or interest.

The entering of an appeal and the proceedings thereon shall not hinder or delay in any way the condemnor’s right to use the condemned property or interest, provided that the condemnor pays or tenders to the owner the amount of the award and, in case of the refusal of the owner to accept the award, deposits the amount awarded with the clerk of the superior court for the benefit of the owner.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 23; Civil Code 1895, § 4679; Civil Code 1910, § 5229; Code 1933, § 36-602.

Law reviews.

For comment on Georgia Power Co. v. Fountain,

207 Ga. 361

,

61 S.E.2d 454

(1950), see 13 Ga. B.J. 341 (1951).

22-2-82.
Effect of tender, payment, or acceptance of assessors’ award on right of appeal; effect of discrepancy between award and final judgment.

The tender, payment, or acceptance of the award shall not prevent either party from prosecuting the appeal. If the amount awarded by the assessors is less than that found by the final judgment, the person seeking condemnation shall be bound to pay the sum so finally adjudged in order to retain the property or interest. If the amount of the final judgment is less than that awarded by the assessors, the owner shall be bound to refund any excess paid to or received by him; and a judgment for such excess shall be rendered against him to be collected by levy as in other cases.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 24; Civil Code 1895, § 4680; Civil Code 1910, § 5230; Code 1933, § 36-603.

22-2-83.
Issuance of execution on award or judgment.

If the condemnor fails to pay the amount of the award or judgment within ten days after the same is filed or entered, then the clerk shall issue execution upon such award or judgment which may be levied upon any property of the condemnor.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 25; Civil Code 1895, § 4681; Civil Code 1910, § 5231; Code 1933, § 36-604.

22-2-84.
Entry of notice and award on minutes of court; payment of costs.

In all cases, the clerk shall enter the notice and award thereon upon the minutes of the court, and the condemnor shall pay:

The assessors’ costs as provided in Code Section 22-2-40; and

Other costs as provided by law in civil cases in the superior court.

The condemnee shall pay the assessors’ costs as provided in Code Section 22-2-40.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 26; Civil Code 1895, § 4682; Civil Code 1910, § 5232; Code 1933, § 36-605; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1404, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 651, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1688, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 2.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to eminent domain, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 115 (1998).

22-2-84.1.
[Repealed] Appeals to superior court from assessor’s award; reasonable expenses; liability of costs relating to issues of law.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-2-84.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 2; repealed by Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 6/HB 1313, effective April 4, 2006.

22-2-85.
Extent of interest obtainable by condemnor upon condemnation.

Upon the payment by the condemnor of the amount of the award, or the amount of the final judgment if there is an appeal, the condemnor shall become vested with such interest in the property taken as may be necessary to enable the condemnor to exercise his franchise or conduct his business. Whenever the condemnor ceases using the property taken for the purpose of conducting his business, the property shall revert to the person from whom taken, his heirs or assigns. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, whenever any municipality condemns land for protection against floods and freshets, that municipality may acquire a fee simple title to the property condemned on payment of the condemnation money. When such municipality has a population of more than 250,000 according to the last or any future decennial census of the United States, such municipality, or the county in which the major portion of such municipality is located, shall acquire a fee simple title to the property condemned upon payment of the condemnation money.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 27; Civil Code 1895, § 4683; Civil Code 1910, § 5233; Ga. L. 1914, p. 61; Code 1933, § 36-606; Ga. L. 1945, p. 690, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1148, § 1.

Cross references.

Vesting of fee simple title in municipal or county housing authority upon exercise of power of eminent domain, §

8-3-10

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of zoning and land use law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 447 (2005).

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008).

22-2-86.
Manner of payment where owner a minor or under disability and without a legal representative.

If the person entitled to payment of the award or judgment is a minor or under any disability and has no legal representative entitled to receive the money, the money shall be paid to the judge of the probate court of the county, who shall at once cause the money to be invested. To this end, the judge of the probate court of the county of the disabled owner’s residence shall appoint a guardian or other proper representative to receive the money and manage the property in which it may be invested.

History.

Ga. L. 1894, p. 95, § 28; Civil Code 1895, § 4684; Civil Code 1910, § 5234; Code 1933, § 36-607.